If you remember, the city people are behind the questions.
Well, by doing it this way
Well, they are enjoying themselves and those who object and cause problems.
Well, they were suggesting, so what they were doing was answering
Well, from my point of view. Of course, everyone is objective here.
It does not explain everything, and therefore cannot be abandoned, even scientific theories.
I wish everyone a good evening
It can be said that only in discussion, mutual
Well, I focused on a quote from Kant.
The systems are actually artificial. Well, society
I tried to preserve everything as much as I could. Well, continue from there before the subject gets cold.
It depends on the conjuncture, so it lasts for a while, it explains many things, some
well in the last interview
Well, they are coming, they are destroying those walls. Well, what those city people own or
I'm not a man, more solo. Well, I can move more. Eee.
He defines philosophy based on his own relationships.
the structures and the walls with cannon fire
I thought I should add one more word to the title: religion and ideology. Well, that too.
Well, that last discussion about my position. Well, just a little more.
oppressing as they say
Asking questions rather than philosophy Well, my
I can accept the definition of philosophy by Well, it cannot be put forward but everyone understands it.
Well, theory explains some things and
with a certain consistency within itself
Let's do it and I... Well, the explanations I can't say and can't make
Well, this evening is titled Praise for Skeptical Nomads.
Well, a certain comfort, a certain order, in order
We weighed it, we were content to weigh it. Well, naturally, it's something that comes with hosting.
to skeptics and dogmatists, to city dwellers and nomads
Well, it hinders its development.
So the biggest feature of theories is that theories explain everything.
So, what is the work we did with master Sadÿk?
I can think systematically. Then as much as possible. Well, that's why.
dogmatic, stubborn, well, what they have
Well, whether it doesn't work or not depends on society's perception.
Let me tell you, well, I said philosophy versus religion and ideology.
well, on the other hand, nomads from outside
We will make it clear. Well, you know, I am not a person who has the ability to join the choir.
Eee in accordance with the position he is in Eee in his own readings from his own experiences
There may be aspects that it leaves in the dark about what can explain it, but it is within itself.
Well, he asks questions and is muhkem muhkem
I put it. Well, then, eh, bottom.

Questions come and come after a while Well, the walls of those cities Well, those
What does this mean? Well, if you want to understand the verse, we need to take this verse
into consideration. There are narrations on this subject as follows.
There is a narration that there is a hadith from our Prophet saying "Well, so and so"
Because it required an effort, now there are comments.
Well, there would be explanations, that is, the interests of the state.
Commenting on the verses of the Quran is called tafsir. So what is interpretation?
Well, he tries to destroy it by shaking the foundations of doubt first.
Call them Chief, Leader, Ideologist, whatever you want.
The word 'ÿerh' is used. For example, let's say the Quran
Well, it also has a political nature. Well, dogmas must have a Church.
I was very surprised by this, I mean, I was understanding the verse in the Quran and then I realized that it
was a
Well, the word 'sharh' means hadiths in an interesting way.
These turn into ideology because they have political and social consequences.
Well, interpretation Well, it occurs in the interpretation of the holy books.
words or Eee clauses in a passage
It has to attack, so there will be a lot of showdowns there, now interpretation
If the interpretations are ashari according to malikiyyah, if they are matrud according to ashari, they are
interpreted by mutazila.
The whole history of philosophy cannot withstand attacks. Well, there are hundreds of examples.
tavil is carried out, especially the most important tavil, what does tavil mean?
It will make clear within ideological quotation marks,
The ulema must protect the interests of the ulema class
It is called tevil, what is it called tevil?
Another verse says white. Let's say from here that someone
Eee using Eee revises it secretly
This creates a shock, one person does not do this, a generation does not do this.
So-and-so person said this, so-and-so Master said this, so-and-so companion said this
There is definitely a clergy, there is definitely a prophet if you want.
Let's talk about the Holy Quran. There is a commentary of the Holy Quran. What is tafsir? This is the word.
When I say let's look at the interpretation, understanding the interpretation is much more important.
It is used for, that is, an annotation to interpret the words of the prophet.
due to social consequences
There is an interpretation, well there is an interpretation and a commentary.
Well it explains, it's even very interesting When I was young
After all, it's an Eee interpretation in its most innocent form.
There are dominant paradigms that can be given, there are dominant ideologies
He needs to defend his own belief or legal sect to others.
own sect, faction, disposition. Anyway, the verse is in the verse.
Well let me explain it this way
There are a number of contradictions caused by the verse, one verse says black,
This may be attacks from outside, from Christians etc.
a process that repairs and repairs

They confirm their view, but the other side says that there is such and such a verse along with that verse.
God
It cannot be seen in this world, but it can be seen in the afterlife. As a matter of fact, it says in the verse:
Well, there are a lot of interpretations being made
It is not said while doing it, but there is a slang term called plastering.
of
This means B, the verse says so, but
There are hadiths in which it is stated that we will see our Lord in the hereafter, in the afterlife.
The parts aimed at reconciliation are called tavil, the word tavil
The believers will now look at this and say a Mu'tazili
Discussions are unlikely to stand the test of time Permanent topic Agenda
This Lara tafsir and interpretation of explanations, whether related to the words of God,
A light is manifested in the mountain. It is falling to pieces and says, "You cannot see me."
You can't see me, they say okay, but they can't see me in this world. Put it forward one verse.
Look at the history of Marxism, it is the history of plasters, look at the history of religion, plasters
It looks after its Lord. The farm that looks after its Lord
When we look at it, it says "Or the word here means this, but it does not mean that".
says the Lord
Interpretation will be very slang. I'm sorry. I'm talking about such sacred texts.
Interpretation is a plastering process for every member of every religion and every ideology.
It can be inter-denominational, so if you interpret the verse like this, E does not affect your sect.
Well, if we examine this a little bit, you will see that this is not the case, for example, lenterani.
Now some say that God is
Actually, going to the root of the meaning
There is a huge area of debate called vision, God is the other world, that is,
You're interpreting it, well, it doesn't mean they will see it, it means they will stand in front of it or something like
that.
You have to apply new plasters as things change, now you're saying this, brother.
Well, when it comes to commentary, contradictions
That's why God cannot be seen. Well, Mu'tazila, for example, relies on this. Good
They are driving, here is the mutaffifin, they are saying, look, he will be facing their Lord here, that day in
the afterlife.
Why is it historical? Because these types of plasters
Whether it is about the hadiths or the words of the prophets,
Every consciousness structure of the city dweller, that is, dogmatic, has to be plastered.
Because Mutezile relies on this verse, Sen
Lenterani says, you can't see me, look at that mountain, that's the mountain.
You must have heard the verse: Hazrat Musa. Well, can I see you?

He asks, "Can the Universe be created in a day?" Now, in the past, there were not many problems.
I'm not throwing these away, I mean, let me just say that. Well, this is the work I've been working on
for 30-40 years.
Do not cut off the hand of a thief, cut off his hand from stealing.
Punching does not mean slapping, it means giving an example.
Convince them by talking nice, some of them are, sleep with them that night etc.
I wrote an article Hüseyin Atami was saying at that time that it does not mean headscarf
The Quran is against science. Science is against the Quran.
Or my brother, the Holy Quran is a book full of violence, why does it say cut off the hand of the thief?
He says that these things started in the period, this thing is contrary to the spirit of the Quran
Well, they say one day of yours is 1000 days in the sight of God. They are doing something.

So, cover your breasts with your headscarves so that they don't show too much of your fork.
What is ta'vil? It says 6 days, it says day, it says yevm, but it means six cycles.
you say y this is the rahm say y what if it wasn't the light Rahman
Well, he says hit the woman.
so and so, headscarf, wait a minute, now headscarf
Educate him with compassion so that he cannot steal, discipline him in prison
But with modern science, religious people are now telling the truth.
I can't stomach the hand now, the man's hand from here
If they come, that is, if they CZ your wives, that is,
I mean, what was said, what does this go to?
He denies it. What is your evidence? Show your evidence. Doesn't the Quran say, We created it in 6 days?
Brother, I mean, there is a ratio between crime and punishment. Well, can a man's hand be cut off for
stealing money?
The one who takes the thief's hand from stealing says
And do you know what happens at the end? It's no longer 6 days.
So what do you mean?
fedrigoni, the word to hit is used to bring an example, to hit like that
If there are no women, well, I wrote 30 pages about this when I was young, in my 20s.
Tak immediately brings verses for you.
It will happen, he immediately says, wait a minute, don't look at it, this is Muaviye
during the Umayyad period.
Believe me, I spent my whole life there.
It's not in the Quran, they came up with this during the Umayyad period. Isn't this the ulema? This damn ulema,
he did it. What do you mean?
They say the day doesn't convince me either, so the plastering process comes in the way.
So actually coup means love, that is, Love your spouses.
He says, "Oh, it's okay, it's okay." Look, this is just a plaster or a friend.
This is how you cut it my friend, what are we going to do, Allah, the Most Merciful?
Is such a thing possible, this is barbarism, it's true, it's me, too.

In that case
Was it something like a boat or a sailboat? So, Noah says it couldn't be such a ship.
No way, how great is the suffering of the religious consciousness
Due to his Islamist policies, Abdulhamid is suppressing Buhari and so on, and he knows
Buhari by heart just because he knows Buhari by heart.
So, here is the MP saying something that will make a word game.
bomber
It's not a headscarf, it's a cover. A tablecloth is also a cover.
I'm doing it. Well, let me give it to Elmalÿ Hamdi Yazÿr.
waves broke in Noah's flood, goods, world, earth
It's something, it's proletarian, it's just these plastered Marxist plastered examples, that's what I like.
Then of course there is no religion, Sheikh Hussam, Well, there are things, Buhari
He has nothing. Well, he has no navy. Abdulhamid refuted that.
Do you know what this means? When you say proletariat, you also mean peasant class.
Consider this from the most serious scholars. I will publish its meaning.
Well, do you know what Elmalÿ says? Noah's Ark was a steam ship.
Well, I wrote this about a member of parliament many years ago.
You know, what about oil, electricity, now then steam power, Buhari?
At that time, his company Hayriye ferries Eminönü Üsküdar Beykoz steamboats
In the 1900s, in the 1990s, in the 80s, these things
from every mind
Just as there are people who read Buhari, there are Buhari Khans.
says our
We barely managed to get one or two ships. I think they were Rauf Orbays.
They are bombing a couple of beaches and so on, they talk about them exaggeratedly.
It means shawl, put a shawl around your neck and close this place.
I spent a lot of effort on Elmalÿ. Well, such a handle is a solid handle.
In the flood, take a couple of all the animals, humans or
Now, give an introduction to the ones related to religion.
Well, it was under water. Now Noah's Ark was made of wood or something like that.
So there are inns
they are coming to
What about the workers, etc. Well, even the white collar workers, Sadÿk said so, all of them.
I prepared it, so now it says Noah's Flood
Religious
Why is it so effective and something of the Ottomans in that period?
He could do it, or let me give another interpretation.
He says steam is not the way forward, he says we need steam, all the technology at that time was
used to move the ships.
Even when there is a debate in the Parliament of the Parliament
There is a sound, asking whether the verse means that or that, but Elmalÿ also
If I remember correctly, by acting as an admiral etc., with those ships.
There are two things, there was taka
I've been trying to find it for years, I've been looking for an authority on something serious.

when tannur boils, i.e. tandoor stove
So and so was declared, but he is trying to keep the Quran alive with such plaster.
Peace be upon him, he says, "I smell Yusuf", "Oh, that's it", he says, "this is the first telegram", etc.
However, this turns the ferry into a ferry. Well, it turns things into a ferry.
The literal meaning of the verse is when the tandoor boils, but it is a metaphor, when things get hot.
Homer's and Hesiod's Iliad and Odessa Homer's Well things and days and
He says, "Don't do it. So, where does this steam ship come from?"
If you know the author of Elm Lami, that is, those who are interested in theology or something, they would
know this.
It was a bit like that, it was a period when the Quran fell into disrepute.
Look, that's exactly it.
It was forgotten, then it was discovered for the second time and the third time. This is one of them, it was
discovered at that time, then it was forgotten.
Well, everyone interprets everything, whoever doesn't like it, interprets it.
They were throwing coal, wood, etc. into the furnace, and they kept the ship's furnace in the engine room.
In the republic, keep quiet and sit down. Well, we make an agreement and are accepted as respected.
Was the steam ship, that is, Noah Hazard, discovered in the time of Noah?
When interpretation is inevitable, such things are immediately found in problematic passages.
Birds of things are talking, etc., remote communication, in those days.
Well, when you get your fire, what is that stove?
They say, Well, Alan is the person. That is, he has a Unionist side. Evkaf
who passed Noah's ark there and the light of mercy
It means Elmalÿ. Doesn't he know this? He knows it, but it's an ideological obsession.
theogonia hesiods two booklets Well, to the mythological nonsense there
Objections began to come from philosophy. The most serious of these
it says look in the verse it says it says and furu
You are more serious, you cannot find this man from the Constitutional Monarchy and the Republic period.
Nurists do this in their own way. Mr. Nursi has such things. Here is Yakup.
It's very important. Well, what kind of intelligence is this?
Republic
Westerners have finally rediscovered this
Where did this interpretation come from? When it targeted Homer, the first philosophy
He's dreaming of a stove, etc. Well, then, steamboats, steam, westerners didn't find this.
After the thing was done, they gave him the job of interpreting it.
His answer to what he discovered is: Well, many scientific discoveries in history
Well, the mechanisms come into play, they have already taken advantage of this now.
The furnace of the ship says the thing e ship was the thing was steam So
defense
They look for technologies in the Quran and find them. So you say, OK then?
He served as Minister
Eee
Plato made his criticism. Plato said, Well, those who read the State know that
Eee, who wrote the fatwa of Abdulhamid's state

Zeus thing is horny Well, mythology of course, I mean poet house
Your car is in repair. Give me a minute. I'll give you a call.
He says this, but here he means this, this is like this, etc. He explains, it is a normal thing.
also comments on Kant's treatise "So what is enlightenment?"
Then let's say I tell young friends or friends who haven't worked on that subject to come together.
I criticized them and said that they are making jokes here. This shows the respect I have for them.
of
He did something, but what does that mean? The existence of the masculine principle and the
feminine principle of the universe.
They usually do these with mud, so if it were cement it wouldn't be a real thing.
Okay, that's what it says there, so the Zeus woman did something there.
It seems to be a more objective activity. For example, I am philosophy
So you can criticize, I need someone who can criticize the people I value.
Well, for the first time I saw Homer, and who was Democritus? Well, Anaxagoras was the best of them
all.
the nomads against the skeptics through Vama, the general views of the structure
"He uses the word etc" in this sense.
Whatever my capacity is to make them understand.
explanation, that is, we are doing the same thing today. Kant says this, he means this, see what Kant means.
inspirations have been written, but Homer is not just a poet you know, he is a part of the Greek religion.
It's happening now Well, interpretation is something like this and
I did, I mean, I thought it was like that for me.
Let's read Kant's vist of clung treatise together, I will start first.
ve
How will we make our children read this, he said, we are ashamed, he said, Zeus, those who fly and those who
run away from Zeus can barely escape.
About to continue etc. Something I'm shaking it up now Of course these things
Let me explain, says the man. Here is the explanation, look at the prophet.
so and so, you know?
repair is actually a kind of tafsir commentary
comom
Well, I wrote two Monographs, one about Akif and the other about Cemil Meriç.
Aristotle, the elder, gets angry at these. They constantly interpret Homer.
Well, plastering the city's waters with some things, cement, against the attack.
We explain, we do not interpret the evidence, we interpret it, that is, we interpret it.
I'm not trying to save our competence, I can't criticize
hence the sacred text Elijah and odes
From the sentence onwards, I can explain it in a more understandable and level manner.
If you look at such and such a book, if you look at such and such a page, it deals with the same subject again,
there is apori in the following sense.
dogmatists have no chance of surviving without interpreting interpretation, interpreting any intellectual
He makes a philosophical statement to her, suddenly Zeus is saved from his womanizing

trying to plaster the soil and water with straw
Is there a prophet out there? Does God speak such words?
As their shooting continues, after a while that wall collapses and then they build that wall again.
While you are putting forward your opinions, define them. Which one do I use for you?
then
It doesn't make the love less, but I'm not a prankster, so why should I market them?
Let me tell my master who will bring him back, you will say hit the woman, it means love the woman.
The duty of the ulema class to be done by believers
define define religion define ideology I listen ideology
The other one is this, I don't know what you're going to say, by doing something to all of them. Well, it's
attacking very quickly.
The one who plastered the place with two soils like that cannot withstand our cannons, we can fire two
cannonballs.
Well, I said, I mean, how can I get inspired like that for 30 years and still be true to myself?
Well, I often ask three questions to the master.
He says, first he creates light, then he creates the sun, for example.
to prevent, that is, to constantly reveal and frustrate the Sama response processes
We should make the understanding of the century say the inspiration: 30 years then. Well.
The enemies are not saying this, the community is also saying this.
They are trying to knit a new one that has never been seen before when it was knitted.
Let me note that he defines it in the sense and when he puts forward his views
Well, I told you to defend my thesis accordingly, but it didn't work, but it was productive.
I have worked hard and worked for years and then I say that here he says this, he says that, but what he
says here is true.
Nomads are attacking, skeptics, why does this verse say this? Why does this hadith say this, can something
like this happen?
They mix it up as quickly as they can, but criticism and attacks are all
Well, can't you do any of these? You will say that the narration is fake and the stoning verse is fake.
The walls of Eee, which quickly collapsed to fulfill their duties
with which I identify and which is positioned against philosophy.
Once we send it there, that wall will collapse. Maybe most of it has already collapsed.
Make the next one say that, this is how you will turn the ship into a steam ship, wrap the cover.
etc. Now there are contradictions, objections are coming from both inside and outside, now what?
I asked three questions that I couldn't get a full answer to, I said philosophy
Well, in order to be persuaded, you have to wait for your interlocutor to study more.
When I wrote it in 1999, it had been 25 years.
So now I'm coming
Can a slightly educated person create the universe in 6 days?
At least the subject is well, this is the duty of philosophy anyway, to forget the problem.
For example, he criticized Akif for something. We should take inspiration from the Quran.

There is a group of priests, the Kemalists are Latife Hanÿm and Mustafa.
a part and a thing, a religious Par, the vote of religious people
Why did he leave? There was a lot of controversy in the Independence courts.
If you do it against Marxism, that's where this started.
managers
No, this is the most important reaction of dogmatics
Our situation is, you're in ruins, you don't realize it, well, it's like...
They try to understand, etc., but now they can't do it.
Arpali
They are. If you ask a question about religion, why is this, why is this, etc.
This is what teachers do mocal
He says he didn't even read it. It's something the man wrote. One of the former leftists says he didn't read
it.
Theologies are full of things that will expand. For example, they
Those who ask those questions are either ignorant, have bad intentions, or are traitors.
The journalists of the government do that plastering job, I won't name any names, there are many plasterers.
The man says "they are friends of ours" and he says it so politely that, of course, Deniz.
The castle consists of all ideological and religious fortification structures.
A party is given by the son of a private man, and events occur, I don't know what his choice is like.
Wasn't violence used? Why did Atatürk attend his mother's funeral prayer?
Thanks to TKP C for introducing the book Bingöl Erdumlu
One of the founders only says "we" on one or two issues. Did he make a mistake here?
belittling the attack So who is he Who is he About Marxism
It is
Imagine, he says, you are doing business with Israel.
Kemal Ataturk
Well, because there are so many attacks, but at the popular level, mosques
These and their work are permanent things, there are Kemalists too, this is theirs too.
They do the same there too, depending on their strength.
Ben says I don't even need to read the book.
He is constantly on the defensive. I said something. Deism is spreading. Theologians immediately start
working.
In other words, a significant portion of journalists are employed by the government.
He says he is, they silence him, he is the one who gets arrested, it won't happen to him
Traveled Mayir Çayan and so on, they are a legend, they don't publish it immediately anyway, even for
those whose books are published.
That's how I use the city metaphor now.
They didn't leave until they immediately came out and declared them traitors.
They lost, so this also has a big impact on him. What should he do now?
I mean, did it happen like this? Did C guide us a little bit in this matter?
Who is he? He is talking about Atatürk or Kemalism. Who is he?
It's like sticking newspaper on the glass. It can't protect the castle like that. These are made of glass.

Well, he goes to Africa and there they say, sir, this is our pope, Sheikhul Samimi.
Allergy started with Marx, he is already one of the most important minds in this field.
They are bringing it. How does the Englishman look at it? Or the American or the Frenchman?
that thing is African
may be poor in South America as in Latin America
I was doing it, I was wondering how Hazrat Aysh can be a current person, etc. Then the commentaries started.
He talks about Islam about the Quran so you can do it as much as you want
That is to say, Marx is an ideologist when the ideologist is going to swear.
They don't even see a rival, so it's like... Well
A sar is very interesting but where is he like a worm?
He has the right to speak with disgust of Lenin
Haz Ayÿe and Haz Ayÿe have their own words. I'm a little girl and I'm a concubine.
I mean, the issues that I regret most are that I didn't attend that evening.
so or how the British were in India
for religions Well of course it's cultural
Or I'm vulgarizing it a little bit, the plastering mechanism is more primitive
It has a definition, certain interests, certain classes, certain shareholders, certain who does this job.
Marx is talking about religion now, of course, the clergyman's soul is more medieval than that.
French
A magician can be an imam, a mufti, a priest, it doesn't matter.
Priests are not equal so now
Then I saw that concubine is something said to children as young as 8 years old.
prophet
publication Dogmatic walled and its order
Well, to another ideology
There was a magician with a bone in his nose who came there as our mufti and imam.
Marx used to say that Marx could only use a Maris ideological word.
They treat him like the Eee shaman of the Zulu tribe. So an Englishman
Aydÿn Medeni truth like a giraffe
When I found this hadith when I was in my 20s, there was a lot of Sht and even ÿey.
I mean Marx is turning in his grave
things of sovereignty. Intellectuals turn their noses up more easily than them and
their teachers and teachers insult them.
They look at it and say how interesting it is, it has an orientalism to it.
For example, can people marry 6-year-old children? Is there an age limit for marriage in
Islam? Not if you know Islam at all.
We will come when we talk about the word ideology.
How they viewed the Arabs when they invaded Egypt
It is an institution
Therefore, the interpretation mechanism of religion
word E now friend married an 8 year old boy Huge
How will the prophet defend his 25 year old wife
There is a need for order and order, a wheel is working there. Everything has its own direction.

The poet said something, I have told you so many times and written about it.
to exemplify, I explained the annotation, he is innocent, they are one
It has nothing to do with the original, but it almost makes you forget the original, he
interprets it so beautifully.
It is different to ask the question "Am I your lord?"
but poets only get a hold of this generation
Well Ahmet Eee Pasha
haz Hatice is 40 years old, they make her 50 years old, what if she is this young, this old?
gets up with a quick plastering job. Now Marxists do this too
I can't explain it, if it is used literaryly, it won't taste good.
An answer is given: There is a conflict between Bela and Neam.
I mean, I think this is clear enough. Well, it's clear.
"Well, then we don't remember anything," he says.
Where is it being reduced to 20's? There is a rumor there.
 Well, am I not your Lord?
It doesn't take away, that means the man is talking nonsense, he can't plaster it no matter what you do.
Well, we drank Nesimini thing, Vahdet cur
Am I not your lord? They say yes, you are our lord. That's it. But look.
It was written as a book or articles, so these are not gossip or something serious, scientific.
It is an activity of interpretation, it is very natural that poetry is also interpreted, but
Let me quickly explain one of the examples I always use.
Asking if I am not your Lord is something else, that is called trouble.
I have collected at least 45 samples since
 Well, what I offer from time immemorial, nope
Hello, I didn't know, see the interpretation. This is it specifically.
Why did he marry the woman and then she dies to the same person? This is his wife.
must be
So there is a verse, my friend interprets the verse in such a way that
Liberals do it, fascists do it, all dogmatists do it.
Literary People Do This
There are two ways to say "Yes" in Arabic. You say "Yes" to a positive question and a negative one.
He says we got drunk etc. Well, that's exactly it.
If you look at that word in the narration, look at I don't know what else, and do that,
eventually the problem will disappear.
tavil is such a central term that
God says rabbikum, there will be trouble on this
Asun, so we drank the wine of the Union
How does the poet understand that question?
Hazrat Ayÿe's age is being increased to 18 Hazrat Hatice's age is
Let's not distribute it Well, the famous Surah Al-Araf, verse 172 e Souls
That's why they say bullshit interpretation
I love Ahmet Pasha's grudge at the time
Let me see, he offered hello to my soul, Çeÿmi Yar from Eternity. I was so enchanted by
Gayrin.
Those who have a taste for literature will understand this immediately. What does it mean? What was he
saying in the verse? I am yours.
If you are marrying someone who is a child, the things to do are simple:

Look here it turned into a look
He went and said hello to my dear.
"I fell in love there, look at the second couplet"
My soul has never seen or heard another hello for centuries.
Tevhit, Vahdet, etc., make this a splash from now on.
um my adore
Eten asked us, "Am I not your Lord?" He said, "Okay, so we said yes."
It's an interpretation. It tells the souls that this is the first meeting. Am I not your Lord? Yes.
Çeÿmi Yar Çeÿmi Yar says why didn't he say hello with his tongue?
Much
What does he say about the world of spirits? He said hello to my soul.
is an infidel
It's old for you, I'm Majnun, I'm Majnun, you say Leyl, but I only adore you.
Ahmet Pasha said hello, he says
Oh, it still gives me goosebumps
Besme eles, we made our first contract with God, we made this first contract here.
This is literature and this is interpretation
This is still Akif, that is, when they don't understand it now. Of course, current generations enjoy these
things.
Look at the poet's intelligence.
So he didn't have to
Look, the thing said hello to Mÿsra, to my soul.
He says, I have never looked to anyone but God, He says, I have remained faithful to Him.
Akifte was very impressed by this couplet of Ahmet Pasha and asked him to become a Naziree.
Well, I'm your Mecnun, that's what he's saying, I only adore you and now we're old, look.
Leyla says to God that you are crazy. You are the only one I adore.
Look, he touched a rabbi's sand and said hello, hello, hello.
What happened
The lover's eyes looked at Me once in eternity, when the Universe was created.
Then no, then he says, To my soul, that is, to my soul, He says thus
He looked at me with his eyes, meaning he saw him, I am not your lord.
I got drunk, he says, from that day until today
Your madman doesn't say
It is accepted as such by God's servants in the Spiritual World, so that is also a fabrication.
It is assumed that according to the Sufis, He offered hello to my soul from eternity.
He said he looked at me like that, he said he gave me a hello look.
But it gives us pleasure, dogma doesn't give it to us, non-believers
They can't take it, they are right, it is too old now, it is too old.
He understands Nesimi as the Drop in the wine and interprets this, I am your Lord.
Çeÿmi Yar from forever I was so enchanted that I didn't know you were saying hello to Gayrin
presented from Eternity Look, he also went to the Spiritual World
Nazire writes that this is a very risky thing. Look, this is
I'm addicted to our memories, you're the only one I adore
The shehla nigah you offered from Leyla Ezel is my profession
no it ends verse the story ends Here on this

I can give it, I mean, if I took notes. Well, I'm saying it from memory.
Eye to the Lake But the strabismus here is not physical, it is what it is.
literature is filled with these, religious literature is filled with non-religious
Interpretation, but when the artist's brush and words come into play
teviller of the class y Those who protect the urban system this literary literature strong
the most important event in the history of politics
Look, he says again, Tevhit Vahdet Birlik etc.
Indeed, sahla in women is not strabismus, but it is pure sahla.
He says, "I'm still walking around drunk," he says, "I couldn't wake up, apart from you, from that look."
It's a small movie but it's something, Janberk is there and then there
Some people correct it with aesthetic surgery, but some women also have a humped nose.
the men left now
Well, I'm not giving a full explanation in case it's misunderstood, I'm just skipping these parts.
There are many like 928. A guy that Von Trier adores.
Universe
With the regime, with the system, Well, with the order, with the walls, with the walls.
In other words, Nazir should also be equal to the shehla that I presented from time immemorial, Nigah shehla.
I won't go into too much. Let's not spoil the secret.
In literature now, it's about Jesus, for example, oh my Lord, pictures, for example.
It's completely different, this is what we say
Interpretations usually come from the opponents. So the nomads come, or as I call them.
 Well, let me say like aluser, ideological
Well, these are ideas, ideologies that he produces to keep himself afloat.
there is it here, hello to my dear
It gives the woman all her character, so it's a matter of proportion.
Well, hundreds of thousands of examples
Well, it adds beauty to a woman's face, like the Belt on the Nose.
He says he couldn't leave, now look, these are all interpretations, hundreds of such examples.
You will watch it, it is completely different and it is fake and it is a
interpretation is the whole history of philosophy, history of literature, religion
Nigah Actually, squinting is a woman's squinting look.
When you were created, you looked at me one by one.
Now, I can't think of the director's name, but he is a legendary man.
Those who cannot get along and are left out are not thrown out.
On Nigah I cannot speak so openly in a video or an interview to such a large audience.
For example, there is a movie about Jean Dark during the silent cinema era.
The aunt says, "I'm addicted to you. You're the only one I adore, Leyla."
It comes from the herbs that I call nevabit because I use it frequently.
education is the apparatus of the school model system
This one was saying "I presented it from pre-eternity" and this one was saying "Pre-Eternity".

But I answered the question in the form of praying while smoking.
So am I?
by adjusting its form to the conditions in every age, in every century or in every period.
It's filling up, oh my God, oh my God, I mean, they read them like a literary text.
especially this job
After the first tomb was built, the temples were always
so now ok so far
One of them was very impressive. Well, for example, let's say prayer.
can i hum
You say "I smelled something from a distance", but there is remote communication.
What would you answer? If I ask you, write this seriously.
It has been around since the beginning of Göbeklitepe. Of course, it goes back
even further.
He gave everything about communication and explanation. It was very impressive.
You do it, you like to hit, you do it, you make a shawl for the cover. Well, Noah's
No way, where could it be? No way, friends can smoke while praying.
It is the way to keep the city alive
We were together with his beloved wife Zeynep, he said a word there, I said
No, I'm asking you to pray.
It is essentially a fabrication, with the necessary changes in form.
If you see, the tightest interpretations in the world are the Jews, the Kabbalists.
You can't deal with the Shiites either, so I can say what the bottom of
interpretation is.
There are human corpses under the shrine. Go to West Minsta.
That's how you enter the church from over the cemetery
I really wonder if he can light a cigarette while praying.
Well, religion is standing like this
If you ask, the meaning changes completely. Here are the meanings of interpretation.
while smoking
Can't I pray in my mind while smoking? You never did.
This is also in Christianity, Jewish Kabbalah, etc.
I say this because it is in our country. Well, after the first father and first grandfather died
and were buried.
One of them said something like making himself redundant, but
Is it possible or not? Don't do anything, but let me ask you this: say a prayer while
smoking.
You are making his ship a steam ship or something.
religion is an absolutely dogmatic structure ancient times humanity humanity
Write to me so I don't forget this, this is an example.
Do cigarettes and prayers change side by side? What are you doing, 6 days, 6 cycles?
While I'm asking "Can I smoke?" it might be true that you're disrespecting me.
So now therefore the interpretation of a religion E is a city a Dogmatic
in london too
You are walking. So this is about the unity of society with the past and the dead.
Even the other day with Ufuk Uras

Now such texts cannot be produced, so they cannot be used as information.
I mean, the 1960s were the heyday of the intelligentsia.
He reveals his entire theory on the page
He doesn't pump out information, so that's generally a sign of incompetence.
It doesn't happen in countries like these because we don't have ants working on the material.
I said philosophy is destructive to all dogmatic structures
bringing
I'm saying it for those of you who take this seriously, if there are people hanging around there, they won't give a
damn.
well
and finishes whatever he has to say y no one does this or that
reading Well
Is it incomprehensible now Therefore Religion
I read it again and again. Well, later it had the same effect again.
So he says "I wrote this" and so on. Coughing and writing are the same thing for him.
That's what Sencer divi plurals e Idris little Ömerler Baykan
He needs to spend time on planting flowers or something like that.
Well let me tell you this once again after many years
If you ask me, the brightest period was the 60s, towards the end of the 60s.
This is very difficult, I mean writing 20 volumes. These are not skills.
When thought and material combine, even when it pulls the material back, our
The thinker cannot be a bee at the same time, so what about the flower doctor? Well, his juice is honey.
When we say we are attacking, when we say we are throwing cannonballs, when we say
nomad raids, it is like this.
Shakes the cannonball alone, here it is, after 5 years, after 10 years
Therefore, religion is the best solidarity that man can find in history.
1969 I was 7 years old, then in the 2nd grade of primary school.
It is obvious that he has read all the texts on the right, so there is nothing he has not seen, but 40
He shouldn't buy ÿerif Mardin's book on religion and ideology.
Well, ÿerif Mardinler, they produced very strict texts in that period.
He can't say, "You didn't look, you didn't see this." The bibliography is solid, but there is an opinion.
What is it? Let's define it first. I mentioned the issue of interpretation, so here it is.
Well, for now. Of course, it looks a bit old. It was published in 69. I request it from you.
Caesars
Like, no, it's not like that, it writes 50 pages, it writes 80 pages.
I say ants, ants should also do it, or is literature doing philosophy?
I read it. Well, I read it when I was young and I was very impressed by it.
Guys, I won't name names now, I mean, he wrote 50 volumes.
65 to 6570 71 is an uncompetitive ceiling
In order to get what it does, the bee must also be interested in botany.
Don't think of an army just doing your thing alone
Well, it is one of the forms. Well, I was going to say it in the introduction before I forget.

who thinks that he can express his thoughts without anything happening to him, or
It doesn't matter whether it is non-existent or not, it belongs to social life, religion has given them all.
the hand
First, it says Chaos happened, it came into being, it means it didn't exist, it didn't exist, it came into being.
Well, that's what brought out the interpretation. The sophists have ruined it.
When I say religious people here, I do not mean people from the public.
a few more people shake it and so on. He washes them and they make a new one.
from myth to logos myth and logos is the myth here
on
There was a word first, there was nothing else before that. Okay, so there is a linguistic consistency
here.
Things we learned: be moral, be decent, don't fight with your friends, etc.
Doubts have been opened. Therefore, I pit religion against philosophy.
Those other philosophers will destroy it too. Therefore, philosophy's first rival is
It doesn't say Chaos happened first. If it happened, there was a time before chaos. How is this the
beginning?
Without it, there would be no civilization. Civilization is brought together by society and division of labor.
also continue
What is philosophy? It is criticism. What does it criticize?
Without religion, which has enabled people to live as a society for centuries, there would be no society. What
does this mean?
Time and so on, for example, it says that first there is Chaos.
We were excited. The man also says that if it happened, it means there was a time before the chaos.
On the one hand, they entered, and of course, discussion environments.
has to change, history progresses, that is, at different speeds.
I am talking about positive evidence, flag, state, homeland, etc., all of which have political content.
Men who dare to ask some questions, but that's what Homer says
These are not religious beliefs but general opinions that we have inherited from our parents since our
childhood.
I will not argue
There is or there is no inconsistency. But Hesiod does not say that, he does not say that there was
Chaos first.
Therefore, a religious person cannot philosophize.
What happened to religion? Since it's such a cliché, I'll just mention it.
The conditions for the emergence of philosophy have come. That is another topic now.
says then it's that simple, logically flawed, first Chaos
Philosophy has always had great New Beginning periods.
Well, it doesn't matter if philosophy itself becomes dogma or not.
He says it happened, look, there was Chaos first.
If there were no dogma, if there were no founding beliefs, there would be superstitions.
expanded, Plato came to Aristotle, from the 6th to the 3rd centuries
of criticism

But think about it: 3000 years ago, 5000 years ago, 2000 years ago, 200 years ago, 100 years ago.
will protect the castle so that it can protect it The castle protects the city e soldiers inside the city
Why do readers have to be Dogmatic? How can Kemalists not be Dogmatic?
It has social psychological eeee eee functions and is very
You have birth, marriage and death.
or Clergy in my professional mind
This man is not throwing bullets at palaces, but he is an enemy in the palace
You're causing mischief, you're confusing people, now talking about these things
It is inherently a political institution, an epistemological institution
Answer those balls to what kind of arrows
dogmatic political because it
What do I mean when I say untalented?
ideology is either the ideology that protects the power or the ideology that tries to seize the power
Without it, there would be no city. So, did you throw stones? What are you throwing at the union?
Dogma, don't applaud but impose a ban. See how problems arise. Please don't applaud.
If there is, he says dind, which means he prays and fasts.
There are clergy, they also protect the King, maintain the order, etc. to maintain the order.
How can Islamists not be dogmatic? How can Marxists not be dogmatic?
It is important that you cannot injure them. How will you keep the family alive?
An imam will come there and perform the funeral prayer, wearing goggles and sitting on the sidelines.
An ideologue who was educated in the ulema class
hurting those who throw stones, protecting the system, protecting the city, protecting the city
It doesn't matter 50 years ago, it doesn't matter if you kill the man who throws stones, that is, the man who
asks questions.
Outside, either among the people, or outside the castle, the man's duty comes from inside or outside the
castle.
It's easy in the 2000s. It's easy up to a point.
It is not a theory, say it is not a theory, it is a way of living.
eee the settled order The walls of the castle Dogmatic
You are throwing stones at unity, thinking, asking questions, causing discord.
ideologies Therefore, the word ideology is already political and religion is also political.
Is it something? Is it God's command? But inevitably?
I'm not saying this man is interested in philosophy
political political Because social and all power
Because it protects the ideology of the order, that is, it protects the religion. Because what does the city owe to
religion?
It doesn't work, or they applaud the actors, etc. Even there, look, even that is a thing.
A priest is coming. So a wizard is coming to my mind. His political and social duty comes to mind.

We were thinking that it would contribute to internal peace, etc. I was watching
democratization etc. But of course there is some background.
He says that the ideology of the governed is important, and that's where the talk of people's
Islam comes from.
Well, they have started to make serious mistakes lately, here is Çamlÿca Mosque
Interests, people's favor towards the government, they have been standing for 20 years
There are writers and journalists commenting on it. I look at their comments. No one can
see them.
Rest in peace, the republic says all
reaction and existing Well, let's say funeral rituals
works and does this through Islam, Ottoman and the republic.
I left And so there was no significant repercussion of the government.
I did it Why am I saying this It's so simple For a reason
I will say, for example, worldview, ideology etc.
If you read what he has, you will see that ÿerif Mardin, let's say,
Look at the word superstition, I have it on TV.
The functions of religion as an ideology in society and on the streets
Don't do this, we need to raise conservative artists.
since about me in new dawn in 1998
Self-interested people curse Why Because it
It didn't work, so it turned into anti-Republican.
or bury me with takbirs
Folk Islam, what does the man on the street feel now?
Well, some numbers about theater actors. Well, numbers in Istanbul city theaters.
none
The people are always stupid. Here they are, they distributed tea and bagels.
The characteristics of the secularization of the Ottoman Empire and Islam are the same
So this religion is playing with Islam and destroying Islam.
It's a ritual that goes against their own minds. It's a secular ritual.
When it is said, the ideology of the administrators can be understood.
I also had knowledge, so I always kept my distance and
and of course he divides it into two, saying that when it comes to a very
important point
At first, we were expecting something to happen. Well, it was more positive.
namely politics and ideology and religion and
Allah
to understand and interpret the man's way of understanding the world
I started writing, this government came in 2002, I came in 2011.
A conservative art manifesto was written in this country, and I criticized them very seriously.
Those who curse themselves have the same ideology as them.
Dogmatic Well, there was always humiliation of the people, both in the Ottoman Empire and in the ulema below.
That's why I say read religion and ideology, because that book is essentially
They started filming there, I intervened and said this
Look, friends, I've been through it since the day I came to power.
Here they are
It means that there is no unity, national unity and solidarity without being a member of the ummah.
Well he is planning
What happens? Why do these people love Cem Karaca?

I use the word in the broader sense of welten shung welten scha world
But when you say that Islam is a religion of science, it is enlightened and it is against such
superstitions,
Islam has a worldview, society, politics, life, family, people.
Move over, because it's not essential, I mean the word "secular"
Is her hair long, short or brunette? Isn't this essential, her hair is short by accident?
Therefore, the essential and accidental sides of concepts
two
The poor people do not have a lawyer, so they should go to the tomb of Oruç Baba and get a lawsuit.
Ideology is such a thing, this is the feature of dogma. These are of course
They are open and they are open and they believe that Kemalism is also an ideology.
polytheist etc. What was that Yaÿar Nuri language like? Bayraktar Bayraklÿ etc.
beards
So, I said, you are insulting the people, why? Because they were relying on the soldiers.
This has been known since Malinowski. This is the case even in primitive religions. Even in the time of
totemism.
he never saw
y When you say I am Dücane Cüe and his ideas, you are against me, the ideas of that bearded man.
15 years ago
The soldiers say to them, "Well done, son." And they are hitting the people, the theologians, the
clergyman of Aydin, etc.
A look at everything from family to child to moon to star to tree to bird to wolf
It's debatable, it's not essential, I mean you're criticizing a man for something.
Let's say my hair has grown longer. It may hit zero tomorrow. This does not define me, that longhaired man.
My program is to fight the theologians. I still defend superstitions.
There were things because the people have no lawyers so no one rebelled
The view of the world has found its equivalent in Turkish, meaning that the Quran is a world
view.
These are the people who touched that stone and put their hands on that stone so that their child
could be healed.
political and social I am also talking about intellectual dogmas ideology
Marxism is also an ideology. Secular schools, etc.
I cut my hair, dyed it, shortened it and lengthened it.
They were also scared of the military, we had an argument on February 28th and the same thing
happened there too.
Managers always had requests. Religious or non-religious, no matter.
Such native's beliefs explain everything coherently in three sentences
I took off the earring when I said I was against the ideas of the man with the earring.
I said something, religion is also a superstition.
he has a look
People are doing the same thing nowadays, people have never had any respect in these lands.
There is a long-haired man, a bearded man, I will cut it off, Özsel says it doesn't define me.
I defend it, I have a book called Truth and Superstition, I even write there.

devices now no one can be free from this
Look, in two days the Eid lamp will be celebrated. Have a nice lamp.
from destroying attitudes or the State, from destroying thoughts, from destroying the state or
Are we going to buy our goods and take them to our castle or take them to our city?
Philosophy is individual and a search for truth. The truth is in your hands.
Philosophy is like this, then you became married, Kemale Erdin
There are external and internal sides. Is it a constitutive element of the concept? Isn't it?
From inside or outside, man's philosopher sees himself as a philosopher.
tools are also ideological
The philosopher is not the man who holds the truth, I mean, I have a pen.
It's easy to throw away those things outside, you're doing harakiri, so you're doing that to yourself.
It wasn't there at the time, maybe it was still carrying it, but it was fighting against it itself.
you can move forward
Why philosophy is not an opinion on these?
Do you have any suggestions? I don't have a fairy tale, but this is my ear.
You don't have to be a Christian to celebrate Easter.
That's what he says, that is, he reads from a book, does something, etc.
It's not something you can put down, it's not something you can dwell on, truth is always
These are secular, that is, religion itself.
You say: The people you love are calling, you need to call them.
Talking about destroying the outdated fairy tales on which society is based
Does a neighborhood have a city or not?
The truth is not yours to get. What you want is something you want to get. However, Dogmatic truth is
Well the truth
Not Well, set out with the truth
it is
The things you are trying to destroy are you, the society you belong to, your parents, your children.
I'm not talking about building society or destroying society. Look, this is a political issue.
He is the man who tries to destroy, so that Dogma is not outside.
apparatuses, in Alerin's words, the ideological state of the state.
I'm not coming to plunder another Castle, why should I destroy it?
Those truths have been shaken by their truths. So let me put it this way.
Why does he want to bombard and destroy those walls? It's very simple.
These are solidarity
It's scratching, it's wrong, it's inconsistent, so
Look at the verse etc. Look at the hadith, he says, the philosopher says such a truth.
This is something I'm trying to achieve like Leyla. We came to terms with what exists.
a worldview, so is ideology. Well, philosophy, philosophy, a world.
I wonder why, to be able to put better fairy tales and new tales.
you feel it believe it don't believe it
It has truth, it has principles, I mean, look, it defines it like this.
Ah, the philosopher is not such a thing, he is nothing like that.
You can't go out, the moment you go out, you become dogmatic, because the truth is in your pocket like this.
means

Then he used it and it was accepted etc.
They are making external enemies, etc., so you can do this by using muhi.
Among Marxists Eee is not used positively
theology God is science ideology For whom it is not for me I mean just me
He is one of those who criticize him, there are problems now.
You get closer but then this is so and so but there are existing prescriptions so a
Either the system suddenly breaks down or you say something like this
Wouldn't you be disgusted by this insult to Marx? But Leninist
For example, he would say grami. It's a bit complicated, but six Sers
There are scientists doing experiments, do you think it should progress from there?
They did the French revolution in the streets and barricades, they tried to do it in thought
It is dying, this is where criticism starts. Look, I will take your medicines one by one.
They use the word as Marxist ideology, Socialist ideology etc. Nobody calls them
What else can a Marxist do, guys are fighting y a
Ideology is a fabricated concept that emerged with the French Revolution.
So, do you have a new medicine? I don't have a new medicine, but I know that the ones I have do not work and I
hope to find a new medicine.
You can expand it, but Dogmatic is the one who has the truth.
Many soviets, Soviets were established, so a city was established there, here are its walls.
I approve, according to Marx, the most serious discussion on the concept of ideology.
LONG
There is a disease, there are medicines available, you use this, it doesn't get better, throw this away, it gets worse,
throw this away, throw this away.
They don't, they drown them immediately, thousands of things are internal enemies
Let me put it this way, until the second half of the 20th century, the word ideology
There is a plant like this on the ground. If we work on it, we can create something like this.
you because Lenin was the first to use ideology Marxist ideology Socialist ideology
Look, ideology is a disease, it's wrong, metaphysics is wrong.
It was a group of intellectual elitists who thought the world from top to bottom.
Let me tell you why it doesn't work, it's not worth a damn, this, that, that, that
I will be a Marxist and you will not have a problem with power, okay? You will be a real Marxist and you will be
free from ideology.
What if Marx heard you?
It is a concept. Marx also sees idealism in ideology. So, what does ideology ideology mean?
There is, but no one is looking for it, why isn't anyone looking for what they have?
thing Stretched on the curtains of the Iron Curtain, that's his children, ideology
He is a man who only preaches this or explains it to you and tells you to be like me.
I won't go into it, but I guess you already know ideology.
Throw this away, then you need a medicine here. You have to find a new medicine. There are medicines,
but they don't work.

Freud taught us a lot about this, to become aware of a part of the unconscious.
Fascists did not do what they did, neither in Turkey nor in the world
How will you fight? Outside of consciousness. You are dreaming, your dreams are yours.
I woke up, the dream is still in my mind, which dream will you see?
Something like this, it has to be from religious beliefs, doctrinal fiqh, sharia, etc.
There are general opinions and these are socially useful, even if they are outdated.
ideology is to determine
add so the Soviets were a nightmare in what way This is just a philosopher's opinion
Philosophy is here, these general opinions, ourselves, only society and politics.
door slammed
They even destroyed their own men. So, an example from the Islamic world.
Shut up, listen to the adhan, they call the adhan in your ear, they circumcise you, whether you are a girl or a
woman.
Well, the thing that arises from itself is the same thing.
Sugar may also cause insulin resistance. Let me lie down for 5 or 10 minutes.
So why is this the essence of ideologies and religions?
Just do it like this. If he wants to step on the bread, let him say there are angels in it.
Gather together 5 or 10 people and do social engineering. If you're going to say believe it, it's true.
You can also say the same thing as what a Muslim does to a Muslim.
Can you block me or something very interesting today?
Can you decide or block the dreams you don't want ideology is such a thing faith
I'm not talking about these. So, what do your parents tell you?
I'm saying for some of them, society survives with these things, they don't exist.
Apart from that, it creates holes in that thing, for example, it happened in the Islamic world.
This Hegel opened the way for this to be done in a dialectical manner, but what did Marx say?
They say that the people in Turkey are not educated, that the socialists are against the socialists.
For example, ideology is not consciousness, consciousness is
A nightmare so big that the philosopher cannot breathe, the most sincere
We can become aware of some of the things that have captured us, not with some dogmas.
There is no one at home. The cat had made something for us.
God help you, there are thousands of things, precautions and prejudices.
He went back to the thing he rejected, why did he reject Stalin because of Leninism?
What is the problem now? What do you say? Sir, I say:
I said so and so, I was having such a beautiful dream that suddenly
I don't know what it is, don't shout or shout while the adhan is being recited.
Say it's wrong, these are ideology, he said it's bullshit
It happened like this, I fell asleep around 56 o'clock
to muslim
How do they raise you when you're a kid, son, be honest, don't lie, adults can't be lied to, cut your nails.
You can't, that is secondary in our country, that is, the people, and the government.
These things start in society, sitting dead at a desk in a wire tower

They have mansions, they are always in mansions, usually the Chief's
Well, that's it, that's it, that's it, so I did a little Silence fast that evening.
It has a classical form. Well, as educated children, they do the same thing.
Politically, it is a part of a government that works with power.
They are building the ideology of the government and repairing Sunnism accordingly.
religion looks at ideology for Marx. Marx defines it.
mysticism
Those who can escape and breathe, those who can escape
There are priests who are Marxist
Gazali These are what you know, the Sultan gives the money and everything, he gives the order.
There is Diogenes of Sinope, the cynics, these are the cynics of our Sufis.
There are things like that, they may confuse you, but an adult intelligence
What happened to the Bektashis and Mevlevis?
Let's see, these guys are the priests you know, but they are the intellectuals who kill people.
But one of the most serious mistakes that can be made
The Communist Party had the same problem everywhere So listen
They pierced it from here, they pierced it, etc., sects, etc. What is it? It's actually like this.
I tried to keep Eee host in case of Eee state
Do you think they can cope with a Christian priest intellectually?
Therefore
Someone has to do that plastering job. Didn't they do it in the Soviets or in China?
Of those who do this, there is no ancient or modern one. These are political
It emerged as a form of reckoning with religion. That is, pray constantly and fast.
Such a thing would not happen for a Marxist whose ancestors were Marxists, now ideology and religion
are separate.
They do not realize that there is something more primitive in the Islamic world.
He would create a kind of contrary Herbs philosophy, so our history is in a sense
Are the intellectuals workers or not? Will Samiye come or not? Where are they?
He gives, and he gives the money. Of course, he just sits there for a while, writes a book,
and writes rejections. I don't know what.
Well, he doesn't look at external distinctions, he does not look at essential distinctions.
like But those angular ones hidden in the public layers
religion and ideology are the same in terms of worldview
in terms of capacity either Thomas akines
I mean ideology, it's normal, of course, don't explain it to secondary school children as the same thing.
But teacher, Religion is a different prophet.
It is not like now that later on they will become the center, the power and the dogma.
These are a Protestant and a Catholic priest. So, take a look at ÿila Mahiri.
Well since I am
What was the political bureau used for? Italian Communist Party French
Hold this, do that, that's forbidden, that's forbidden, etc. Dervishes, from there.

You will say, for example, that ideology is Marx's most fundamental
If you say so, the proletarian will say so with Lenin
He called the ideas produced in his head ideology and called them to the streets.
I was looking at the biggest problem: Plato and Aristotle do the same things.
So sometimes I put Plato here, I put Aristotle here.
That is, thinking and writing the same things by constantly checking each other.
are the tools that managers build
we will bring the state father will decide for this the one in charge of this
First of all, a peasant is not a worker in a factory.
Since I took the Middle Ages as a starting point, it is enough to go below it from time to time.
and give them to the society
So if everyone is an obstacle, it is not Marx, they call him Sergeant Mate.
Are we going to say her survival or four fingers for Rabia?
Here's my problem that I haven't been able to solve in my mind for years.
Someone will do the ten plastering jobs. In China, it was carried out by the villagers. Here's the thing.
He's changing things like that, there are some places he clearly opposes, but they are
Let's put it that way. These are the things that the secular priest builds. These are what we want
them to be.
Well, he resists these tools.
I will enter society into the factory Lenin was not like that
Where does he say different things? Is this difference not essential?
There is such a thing in the history of philosophy. They are like two separate rivals. You are
progressing a little.
e obstacle He was a very gracious man and Eee never assumed
or a group of intellectuals, intellectuals, priests, secular priests
These are ideologically equipped
Because it is against Marx's views
Well, journalists, professors, etc. who get paid for
Where are you going to eat it with liquid? What are you going to do with the peasant? He is also a worker.
I was looking at the top from the corner of my eye.
relationship
We will remove it or will we do this because Bozkurt? What will we do? Or will the D trend suddenly come
together?
Well no
I'm going there, I'm going there. Of course, this happened because I started from the wrong place, in the
field of Islamic philosophy.
It's not essential either, so it happens to everyone.
Are we in favor of development, are we in favor of statism, do we want a free market, do we want the rule of
law?
But I mean, my biggest thing about philosophy is
They also need to make propaganda. They also need to determine the working class of the governed.
You're moving forward, no, they're saying the same thing, even where they object, they're saying the
same thing.
"These are all Marx's ideas," he said, "I am his secretary."
Until

Because why are you going from the superstructure to the infrastructure, all of Max's theory?
There has been a lot of discussion about revisionism
Philosophy existed in Turkey as well. Religion and
You think, they are worse than anything, so do you want to live in the Soviets, in Iran?
They won't give me the right so I gave up and don't address the society.
They said, "You are not from the group of eaters. You did not fast. Okay, I will fast for sahur too."
It's almost as if the person was a very strict man. Marx was already a different kind of man.
Well, the positions of ideologues after Lenin are the same
or here is the difference between fascism and marxism.
There are those who know, there are those who don't know. Anyway, there is more to say. The secularists
are for themselves.
Everything that Marx left missing
I am years old. He is having iftar today. I said, "What is this?" "What are you doing?"

It directs them and spoils their joy. Now, for example, in Turkey, things
There are no philosophers among ideologists, these are ideologists within a religion.
It's like, when I was a child, my sister would form an alliance with my mother for sahur sahur.
I straightened his face, put it on the plate, he said, "I'm bringing it to you," he kept trying to adapt himself to
Marx.
When so and so is detached from action, this intellectual elite turns the activity into a kind of society.
Well, against ideology
Is it Saudi or EU? I don't want to live in any of them. Don't object, don't criticize.
Own
Did I get up? Are you eating at sahur too? We are eating. Okay, pick me up or something.
He wouldn't do anything, he was the man who saw Marx's genius, but I mean all
places he didn't bring, etc. By the way, don't change the comments, that's opportunism.
reverse and you are doing this strategically, these are board of interpretation
developing Marxism, adapting it, defending against criticism with it
Well, the French Revolution
When they get rid of God, they think they are something, Özgür
They said, "We are fasting and breaking the fast. Well, let me eat, etc., etc. I also have a case.
or the function of ulema in terms of our culture, let's say
Let it be, that is, the interpretation that constantly revises the world view of religion, repairs and plasters
They are looking at religious people etc. They studied in the West, just one or two foreign languages.
They used to do it, I don't know at all back then 9 10
But despite this, from time to time Marx's thoughts positioned himself in a different way.
Ask them any questions that will annoy them.
He was an engineer, he was a kind of ideologist, ideologists
At least my thoughts are free
I would get up, they would wake me up, I would eat at sahur and then it felt very strange.
Ideas belong to him. I just put them in his hand.

How will you think about this control?
I'm doing something dishonest, I'm pretending, I'm saying hell with my tongue, how?
I mean, think about the children growing up in religious families, the father gets up, the mother
Türkiye
During the Eid prayer, everyone is on the street at iftar time. Well, after the adhan is recited, what happens?
do it yourself
It was never founded, how can they imitate Jesus?
That's how ideologues work, I mean, Dogma is always sticking its tongue out at us.
exists and this worldview is associated with the identity of the social when it goes out on the streets.
I was opening your mouth too, stretch your tongue out like an idiot.
Isn't it the festival of holy lamps? And also April 23, November 10, October 29.
Of course, it will happen with my sister and my mother and father. There are no such things, my brother,
I'm too young.
Baba
The tongue of the man who took the sausages will be the same as the tongue of the man who took the sausages.
Their paths have been around for centuries. Well, religions and so on are useful for this purpose and
modern society.
Of course, but it's like a game to me too.
They understand. I also have a naive side. I don't know anything about anything.
He is getting up and so on, especially sister and brother. If there is, what will he do? He will get up
too. Of course, is this bad in a way?
Well, iftar is breaking at the same time, the lights of all the houses are on at night.
This is what a society wants more than this. It's easy.
He says "you have eaten, you are not fasting", what does it have to do with me?
I did it to my children too, I took them to Seykanat restaurant, woke them up at 3 am and be a mother to them.
Did you get up for the morning prayer? Didn't you get up, dad? Especially in these matters.
My sister probably says my mother is doing something to my sister or something.
They say, we will examine you, are you fasting or not?
he is asleep, he sees his neighbors during the Eid prayer or all at the same time
I'm in for them. But here they are, my sister and my mother have made an alliance, they are setting a table. I
mean, we have a table like that at home.
Was I crying? I was doing velcro etc. I mean, I was doing jazz to get to the table.
In this way, he manages the family better, there is ideology and worldview.
ideologies are involved in this, so now it is Eid al-Adha, Ramadan
He would come. Then I would go and eat sausages, San fights, etc. at school, for iftar in the evening.
It is not but I can develop an alternative that keeps the family in unity
So then my tongue must be rusty, I mean, of course, the one who doesn't eat all day long
Is this a society? These are the secondary means of keeping a society together.
They would be very happy because eating at midnight is such a weird, irrelevant thing.

The Syrians are coming, it's a bit too much for us, but the Afghans are coming.
But the differences disappear?
It's not something that if you look at it from one perspective, that is, the local demographic structure
You think it has increased, Rahim Bah gave a lecture in Istanbul, he is one of the fathers of symbolic logic.
Well, okay, but don't you think this cosmopolitanism seems a bit fantastic?
30
Someone says I am from Urfa, someone says I am Turkish.
freedom etc. So how is enthusiasm and cultural progress possible in a society?
It had visible effects. Well, Jewish professors came from Germany
He asks the second and third questions. You look at the answers given by those who say they
are Turks. You look at the answers given by those who say they are Muslims.
Well, he gives statistics. Well, they did it in Izmir in 1969, for example, to the workers.
But I mean, Russian culture, etc., I mean, meat is definitely on time.
I am in favor of this, I have explained the theory of this a lot, there is such a thing as cosmopolitan etc.
Why is philosophy not loved? Why is thinking not loved? Only one person is individual anyway.
When you say "I am a Turk" with the release of "Well, the values you should have"
Unity begins to kill multitude, it becomes monolithic, which is the basis of sociality.
Is it bad if your neighbor is Russian and your neighbor speaks Turkish and after a while he too?
let's call it positivism, logical positivism
The society must have a main body, it must have values
Is there a difference between August, one before modernity and one after?
You see, this is the identity, now they brought them together and became Turkish and Islam.
Turkmens are coming. Well, Russians are coming. These are bad things.
He says he is a Muslim, he looks at what percentage of them say they are Turks, what percent say
they are Muslims, and then...
It happens where, it happens in cosmopolitan places, for example now, people are getting angry.
For those who escaped from the Hitler regime, where is the quality of university education in our country?
They went and asked, someone says, I am from Izmir, someone says
I gave series of lectures, conferences, that is, art and thought. Well,
White Russians came to Istanbul during the Crimean War etc. and they are very visible in our
society.
cccc comes out from where he is sitting and talks about all our values
It comes automatically to you, how do you define yourself from your family?
You can start fasting or it doesn't matter, you won't be together at iftar and drink raki together.
something against so I different cosmopolitanism
Those who are urban and dogmatic produce value
One is the emergence of the nation state at the end of the French Revolution: Homeland, Nation, etc.

They said he could play ball very well, he wanted to be a football player, so they said he was a legend.
I'm not a socialist
I'm not exactly sure anymore, I don't remember, so what does your father do?
Well, what is here is neither a problem nor a theology.
He comes face to face with society, maybe what he can do with his friends, he stays in the middle.
my grandfather
humiliates everyone
No, the actions they take, the structures they establish,
He has worked hard, now look at his life closely. Well, I did this to me.
He starts to think, he objects to some things, he interprets things, that is, from me.
Our job is to protect what?
What will he do? There is a world in front of him. There is a world in his mind. It is in his mind.
Let him have a moustache, a chechi beard, whatever, let him have Trotsky glasses somewhere.
can't do anything with the mechanism
They are asking some kind of questions now, I mean, in society
They are from Erzurum and Ankara, that is, they are a religious family that came to Ankara from Erzurum.
to produce, to sustain and transform those values
When you say you're not a Marxist
He fulfills his desires, then enters theology. Hard-working, smart boy
The professor is sincere and all that. He is politically at odds with his father.
Sinan Canan Look, these are qualified people.
If he opposes himself, what will he do if he opposes himself?
They will work, even if I give them their sectarianism, they won't like me Edip.
I don't know what he's doing, they'll hurt him.
They are trying to protect their childhood memories, I am now
But dad, Imam, he says, "I will enter, I will memorize the Quran, etc.", is dad, Imam?
weakening criticism system stati dark
Well, a compatriot of Mustafa told me, I didn't hear it from Mustafa, he said it was a great ball.
you know well
Going against the world If he's not a mother and father
Think of an Iranian mullah, regardless of whether his robe covers him. There is no difference.
Don't you see, now look, for example, isn't Mustafa Öztürk a serious theologian?
Well, some things are falling out there and he is coming to terms with them.
But the guy they got is a biologist
Marxist ideologists and Islamist ideologists, that is, one's post
After a while he passes his exams and so on.
I mean, he thinks he can't breathe. I don't meet very few people. I mean, I mean, I mean hundreds of e-mails
to me.
Mustafa Öztürk from Giresun Well, Sinan, if I remember correctly
They try to reconcile the two worlds
Man, do you think it is easy to create value?

He was a master of plastering the repairman. Of course, he also had his dark side.
It has nothing to do with my religion, listen to what he says, Sunni.
Things are complicated, things are dark, but this is the end result.
I even told Mustafa himself that Mustafa is doing such things.
I gave it in Germany or Austria, in Australia or in Austria
I can count. So, I am an atheist. I do not believe in Muhammad. I do not believe in the Quran.
Yuksel
So he went and fought with his father, his country, his past and himself.
You understand, that's where the plastering mechanisms come into play.
There is such and such a neighborhood, there is a country, there are vineyards, reject them all, reject them, reject
them all.
It probably seems like it has nothing to do with Islam, but it says that it has nothing to do with the Quran.
The man says he won't leave home without reading Ayetel Kürs, his worldview is like that.
Naturally he stood against the hatred he rejected
You can find this, I'm trying to explain this: When I say ideology, religion, etc., I don't mean such a
doctrine.
Can he say let it be yours? He can't say, none of these can say. It's not easy.
Ayetel Kürsi Reader, just because the man is an atheist
Now, think about your father's strength and what he fought against where he came from.
I don't care about the Quran no matter what your religion says, but it's still apart from what your
father said.
people are eager for truth and qualified
So and so was thrown from something like that, then I support it too
Was it in Vienna or something?
I'm based on 19 in the Quran. Actually, none of these thoughts are like that.
that naughty thing is the father of the thing
There are these, they also have political aspects. I mean, these are not innocent things.
If he didn't say Quran when he spoke, he was a Muslim. They didn't see it that way anyway.
You will find brothers, you will find yourself masters, like Reÿat Al etc.
Reject but you're still holding on somewhere
Look, this is not consciousness, this is unconscious. I give you hundreds of names.
All the values he criticizes are taken to the extreme
How can he deny himself? He can only say that I don't agree with his comments, you are wrong.
friends, breathing air and water, there is a father, there is a grandfather, there is a mother,
there is a sister.
They are historicists, I don't know what they say, they understand half of what they say, they don't
understand the other half, they lynch them.
The place where his father is not, that is, whatever his father advocates
People can be unbalanced It can be like this You can find faults in everyone You can also find
thousands of faults in me
He is fighting against his father with the Qur'an behind him. Can he say to his father, the Qur'an?
"Well, I saw this by chance while listening to one of his speeches," he said every morning while leaving.
Well, mullahs were one of the most famous things of Sadettin Yüksel.

When he says so and so, he goes to the pharmacy. He is 85 years old, he can't see,
things like that are there.
that he can bring his friends and family to all of them.
If someone says you didn't discipline your son,
Sometimes I
Maybe I'll let the family's secrets slip, I'll say something. Here's something.
We lived poor and that's why he developed a grudge or something. I don't know. Now it's fast.
who started by saying "I don't believe it"
Well, he doesn't declare this, it's about identity. What does this say?
my son is very
On the contrary, to upset your mother, you say everything she doesn't want, you want to upset your father.
He says he went beyond where he is from because he is in his village and city.
It could have been, I don't know, my uncle.
Why do they start because of ideology?
Be careful, the balances you have to take care of
I said I wouldn't tell. They didn't even understand that.
When it happens, I threaten them, we do something, we get away with it.
I'm not a Muslim, huh?
You've made me suffer so much for years. Look, I've always done everything to them.
It makes me sad, are you a communist?
I'm telling my memories here, my sister says something to me, you don't have memories, don't tell me anything.
We didn't have any bread at the time, I can make you look weak.
I make it up to get revenge on someone.
Even though they are still standing somewhere in the Circle
There are philosophers, so we also have such a tradition.
No one in his family can tell
He helps me, my mother is happy etc. No, are you the mother of that irreligious person? Why?
Do you know? I am now in my father's hometown.
The hard worker is very good, it's like this, oh, are you the mother of teacher Ducan?
You want to upset your brother, even if I had a war with them, I'm telling you now.
If there were no, my uncle has sons, my uncle has sons, for example, they lived very well.
y if it wasn't emotional, that is, if it was something intellectual, or something real.
I wouldn't tell my mother, even if she told me, my mother has always been proud of me throughout her life.
There are people you don't want to upset or just
But it could have been something I could have hated, a domestic war
I don't believe in God, I'm an atheist, let me say that in a sentence like this.
He said, well, look at it as much as you want, as free as you want.
Because now, for example, what did I say that would upset my mother?
Well, that's what I'm saying, for example, it's something they are sensitive about.
You can do it. Here's how extreme there are people who believe you're doing it.
I'm not saying that's what they say, they misunderstand and act even though they don't believe it.
Somehow, I don't understand this. Let me tell you, too.

Oh, of course, Bahriye, even if it's a lot, may God have mercy on her, that woman too, for example.
etc. This is discussion etiquette. Well, so-called.
Normally, if he were truly enlightened, what would he do in theology?
Look, he says this here, he says that here, you say that. Why?
You will ask things that will have a broader answer value than he expected.
Philosophy is the limit
I'm not saying that's all they have, I mean they find a place to stay in the apartment and it reduces it.
There is something about how to discuss science
There are plasterers, some of them plaster badly
nothing explain answer nothing nothing at all so I have to say I built a building
How will you lower your guard against a man's attack? Which question?
I'm on the floor, I didn't go anywhere, that's why I'm in my room
Don't argue with someone else according to yourself
your position is nomadic, you don't belong anywhere, ask freely
Well, these are the sciences. Well, when there are problems, it is
Translated: He must have said something to me, now he went to the Kemalists' neighborhood.
Some of them are good at plastering liquid, that is, well.
something is a field, it exists in rhetoric as well. It also exists in logic, since Aristotle.
there was there was
heh blah blah Okay then let me ask this blah blah blah
Even if you do, you don't have to show them, we are under pressure anyway.
Well he's used to it
By the way, he becomes a repair and plastering expert, and by the way, they take away liquid.
You will ask: When will the proof be accepted? When will the proof be refuted?
It was a strict thing, but well, the parts whose shape is the shape of religion
How to ask your opponent, what answer will he give, how to ban him?
Well, you say that those who forget to be ashamed will plaster everything.
You are not. Well, can I just ask you a question?
So he can't perceive that if it's not from us, it's from someone else.
He used to teach me the ones that are not similar, plastic arts, betting, debating, debating arts.
According to the quality of education they receive, well, good craftsmen, good mechanics, good
you ask
He left the neighborhood, I'm like Bilan, where did I go, friend, it's the same again.
There is the purity and sincerity of belief in something.
Well, therefore, philosophy's opposition to religion and ideology.
It was widely taught by priests in the Middle Ages. This is actually a kind of plastering.
I'm not talking about government pressure or anything like that. Everywhere is neighborhoods.
They did it, if it's too much, they'll screw you over, but the truth is always
And so do Marxists

Something emerges or calls idealism Materialism
So the big bang
in
Are you talking about religion? I mean, when you say religion, okay, even in religion, for example, I mean
monotheistic religions.
It says deploy your defense system naturally.
definition ideology
eventually it goes to other generations and that criticism continues from somewhere
That's the case even today, I don't have anything yet
Yaÿar gripr politically Socially Intellectually scientifically
are discussed, that is, the terminologies of different disciplines are also interrelated.
I say problematic, for example, I mean, what could happen?
Can I provide an explanation, can I provide a definition, that is, under the religion class?
When was Copernicus discovered? A century later
In the field of sociology, these issues are discussed in separate terms.
They take it for granted that philosophy has no neighborhood. Philosophy has its own
But when I say religion, I do not understand it as an essential that can include all religions.
So do you think the public knew Newton, they know Copernicus?
Now he's selling it The universe is expanding, blah blah blah this
No way. Well, the world view is more clear here.
Why did I say Buddhism? Because according to, well, according to the Middle East.
He sets up his attack system accordingly. An intellectual living in this country will do this. When he listens to it, he
thinks of Islam.
Otherwise, Confucianism is one thing, Shintoism is another thing, etc.
We have heard from such serious men that they do not want to reconsider.
after
Man becomes an ideology, how does this happen?
There are some hypotheses, namely some Big Bang. For example, I say logically
Even what you call this science is new, that is, it is not considered as such an independent science.
It is necessary to compare. That's why you call it science. Okay, I say science is more than that.
a general statement in which everything that can enter can take part
asÿr So say something right away, they don't accept it right away
He knows his society better than those who govern it.
It is discussed separately in the sciences, philosophy deals with it in separate terms, and it is discussed
separately in law.
I wonder if I can make a definition, when I say religion, I mean its members, the setting of the
mosque, an obstructive
Copernicus did not know anything, not even the scholars
Of course, I don't give out some things just for information purposes, but I mean
Religious people also buy and sell, and when they run out, they leave a new one behind.
When you say it's not reactionary, you don't think of Hasidic Jews, those here do. It means those in Israel.
It causes some things to change in society and the public does not even know about it.

In love with Freud, for example, Freud is also like that. He either establishes a dogmatic organization.
It was foreign. Therefore, philosophy in philosophy
How many and hierarchical there are throws and matas as well, so a little bit
I mean, think about it, you reject the Oedipus complex. I'm still a Freudian.
They can't, look, the man says the exact opposite of what Marx said. I say Marxism.
Be free, there is no such thing, how will we have some dogmas, but on the other hand
with them?
They say he did it because Aristotle made his criticisms of Plato do this.
It's debatable how much the man from Asar Spinoza understands.
Ideology is not science, it has a scientific side, it has contributions etc.
Especially a relative did the job, that's normal, that's how he should do it.
Then let's philosophize, let's destroy all our things, our dogmas, let's philosophize
You say epicureans, you say platonists, who did Plato put in the academy?
Well, it will disturb
Everyone who speaks against Hegel is a traitor, so give the man power for three days.
In this respect, philosophy is something that a free person can do.
Are there any philosophies that transcend and become dogmatic?
Systematic things turn into dogma, I'm a Hegelian friend, so the man says, man.
If they had political interests, if they had any tendencies, the Council of Ministers, the
Minister of War, was finance.
But after a while, it's okay
You will ask him if he is a Marxist-Leninist, and if he says he is not a Leninist, it will be a bit harsh.
We will deal with it, so when we say religion, you will not recognize religion.
Aristotle's Metex
So and it's still going on for a long time, it has international things, it has organizations.
He kills Plato in metaphysics and the platonists his nephew
He doesn't say anything, I mean, he's in love with a woman, he's in love with a girl.
up to but ideology defines it from top to bottom and accepts it as immutable
There is no such thing or let's start by philosophizing and finally
Even many people did not put his nephew in charge of the family foundation like Aristotle
to everyone
Well, it is also an ideology because Freudianism is also an ideology.
It's not a job, look, I'm fixing this. So let's be free first.
They are killing you too, they are no different from religion, you say that philosophies are
just illusions.
The minister and so on leave immediately. What will philosophy do with him?
No matter what you do, you can't find anything wrong with Hegel. I won't name names now.
seriously
e and if it pits it against philosophy Well, philosophy has no slaves

There will be those who own it, there will be those who object, there will be conflicts, etc.
What if one brush pays fortunes? You are difficult.
Let him do it, but don't bother with philosophy Well, as a pure slave
Like, he names the child Ulaÿ, Deniz names him, Devrim names him.
He publishes the books, you will read this, Fakir Baykurt starts it. Well,
There is no skullcap on his head, no robe, no turban, fleece mustache etc. There are bruises under his eyes.
Our effort to learn and pay attention to what is different
Then someone has to destroy them and they will benefit from it.
Those who are good will turn the corner. This is always the case, and ideologically, they put forward such a
theory.
There is not a single man like this that I will study, unless he is an idiot, not if his father is a bully, my son.
Well, he couldn't buy paint, so I'll call him a child because he was 37.
You need to read etc. Anyway, when you turn 15, that's what you want.
A competency that can put forward one's own theories, one's own theses
ÿÿ is irrational, that is, starting philosophy cannot be a rational decision.
He lives, but Jesus comes to the cross for Hüseyin
Then you need to read the communist manifesto first, and then there you go.
We'll throw it away saying it's not this, we'll move on completely.
You can get it, fang, it doesn't take any work, this is how it works, it was like this in religions too, I mean
Jesus
I can't start philosophy even as a free man
after
Yaÿar Kemal, you will read this
Here's my sister, Mac, he's a brother and all that, but that's where it ends, the kid is already very smart.
He knows the language, he says I finished the classics of I don't know what Shakespeare, he
says he finished Shakespeare, he says he was 8 years old V
What will happen as our horizon expands, our power of understanding, our knowledge
He committed suicide at the age of 10, but now he's not a fango painting
humanity, yes, consciousness, fall down, get up, continue on your way
Because it's always been like this. I mean, Fango couldn't sell its own pictures.
Those who are appointed and then embrace that theory, but that's how science develops.
There is such a thing as saying "You will be a philosopher, I will do something to you". For
example, this is the case with the left, it is the same with religious people.
Here he becomes Hafiz, the one you know becomes Hafiz. Only beards like this, curls from here or
Can you put it? If you put it, I'm happy. It will come out of trouble, but it will come out.
They cut off their heads and slaughter them. Children, but this
I am philosophy
scarlet book
There is no such thing as liberation anyway, but you can express your own thoughts.
Let's not even start, we don't even know where it gets stuck in us, somehow, with an impulse.
Pope Yaÿar is crucified, cardinals
You will read this, you will read this, the child is already 10 years old and if he is even a little smart.
For example, John Start is like that, he was hurt, look at him, he is 7 years old, 6
As it expands, some of it will fall out on its own, we will do something with some of it, I will suppress
some of it.

It's okay, I couldn't read Marx enough, let my child read it.
With the ideology of the Religious Affairs official on that street
In a soft sense, but it has political consequences. He goes to Friday prayer. Of course,
he goes to that.
People say someone
Mohammed
The monster comes out from among them to the hulu hulu hulu section
You know, I'm exaggerating now. When I finished Newton's work, I had just turned 9 years
old. He says, a man is crazy.
etc. For example, Sunniism is an ideology, Shiism is an ideology.
For example, they take them down shamelessly
Marxism, for example, is ideology in the strict sense. Marx, to our fault,
They despise but they don't realize it's the same fabric as them
But he will say so and so, so they are not all like that.
Does it matter if it were? Philosophy is a quest, a Marxist
He says there are two ideologies in sociology.
For example, that old man with a beard like that. Who will you vote for?
I saw some of its pieces as if I was trying to do something
He realized that he could not cope with these even during his party period.
He will say, "I am a Muslim, of course." He will say, "I am against reactionaries, these
bigots, and sects."
says he will vote
I can't memorize the Quran, my child.
The people of Trabzon are not important, don't the people among the people have an ideology?
Someone says nation, someone says Islam, someone says Turk, someone says Hazrat.
Someone says Ataturk, it doesn't matter, but do something to them.
They are coming here, who is the one who is going crazy, why do we belong to no side?
I don't have a truth to convey. Well, some pieces, some a little bit.
These are already enough for the father to be crazy, he is from the family, I couldn't be
my child.
Asharism is an ideology Matur Mutezile All One
The man's ideology is not the same, it is ideology in the strict sense.
Don't mind, but Islam, for example, is an ideology in the strictest sense, Fascism is like that.
But, well, an imam, a theologian, a
They are the same from the beginning, the same structures, the words are different
Only when there is pressure, and also when they are results-oriented
Hard ideologies are made, this is ideology in the harsh sense
he says, of course, he says he will give it to something, he says he will give it to Erdoÿan
Cumhuriyet Kemal, what percentage of things understood? I don't know. They just
ignore them.
Ask the other one. Of course, now Ataturk saved the country. Well, it's not that much.
But is there room for a few more lifetimes?
Let him memorize it. Socially, these are not wrong. Society is like this, culture is like this, look,
there are two things in ideologies.
Am the
He fasts and says he will vote for him, the most oppressive thing about the republic
The man on the street says he will sacrifice himself for Tayyib
We're not, so we still have a chance to find it
Afar
It's ideology, but what about the people of Sivas, Malatya, I don't know, people of Mersin,
people of Antalya

There is a problem of logically saying "I'm looking" at the same time.
I wonder if such a question ever comes to your mind: Did My Mother Love Me?
I think I hated my mother and can you make a sentence like this?
how to talk to chefs first In principle
persistently refraining from establishing a church
There needs to be a prayer to be able to see, so I can see some of it. I mean, your
eyes like this.
So take a marxist who doesn't seek, most I will say marxism
Why should I choose the part that concerns me?
Asking the question Do you think it is easy to ask that question?
He says let's strive for future generations in a heavenly world
It is difficult to lean on one place and criticize others.
stone, steel, iron, reinforced concrete
Of course, he will convey the message. So, come brother, look, we promise you Heaven.
Skeptics whose names are not even remembered, but there are those who take over the flag
Possibly philosophy always denies itself without coming to terms with general opinions.
It's like saying let's publish a magazine, you publish it and don't become a schoolboy.
I mean, you may find that something you love very much may not be so at all, or you may
hate it very much.
inconsistency He says he already found it, he says he is a Marxist, he names it
Without such dogmas, these walls
and not aspiring to be a chief or a priest
This is not something that can be prevented 'Cause it's not always a bad church, it's a school
Let me see. I mean, you don't need to open the whole veil. I mean, if you've put in a lot of effort.
I wonder how he looks at a sehlan nigah exposed?
Marxist the same
You pay the dues, it's enough, it always comes to that in the end
He already loves me, I know, my dear. Maybe I'll do it all my life.
yay
You say, have you ever asked such a serious question?
You don't care about war, philosophy is war with all churches, war with all priests, all
claim to see not the destructible part
He says we are on the other side, not on this side, he says it is not there now, he says we are.
Just being able to throw that stone
I don't see anyone around who denies himself.
But as I said, they are paper towers.
Well, the truth is propaganda for you after that.
You can set up a group of 5 or 10 people, let's do philosophy here or something.
When something you want is actually one of the things you desire most in life
It can't be established, but in the end, who always wins, those who throw stones?
You can't see him naked anyway. There is no such thing, but you can see one of his eyes.
This is how it has been y Church without priesthood

There is no part, that is, there are parts. Dogma is the claim to be a whole and it is a social
and political
It is unimaginable
The seeker is a man trying to reach the truth and Philosophy is a walk.
Because you decide to walk, it's all a conscious decision.
He should go in his life to see how I can learn the truth of this matter.
If he has grandchildren, Majnun won't be able to reunite with Leyla.
Of course, this is literary. These are literary descriptions. You appreciate them. But
It means power, alternative prophets have been killed, for example, the false prophet
Those who hold the truth are governed by tar Tan, so it is believed
They can establish a state For this
Hegel says, "Is this like someone who loves wine?"
What is Mecnun a symbol of?
Why is the punishment death? Why is the punishment for leaving religion
It is very destructive socially and politically.
Take them for wisdom, you are very serious translations.
It's hard to find three crazy people, so it's always hard to reach.
It is a quest in the word philosopher. Do some work on Filo.
has to put forward this claim as a society to establish a society to establish a state
There are false prophets, onu museylemetül kerezap
it's not a choice it's a quest it requires a trauma something something is wrong
to ask questions
He has a story, what more can they say? I mean, he ends up with Leyla.
They said, "Is this why you do things to create havoc?"
Our relationship with truth is not something mysterious and mystical. What am I trying to say?
He's killing me saying, "It's unclear, maybe he's a colleague too, why?"
that's why it's a truth
They are killed like fratricide, so the existence of an alternative state is an alternative
but intellectually and scientifically it is a bigger illusion than this.
So there is a sense of search there, there is no complete deprivation, there is no difference.
Symbol of lovers So what did Mecnun do? Did he become a grandfather?
Death is very simple, because those who leave religion will find a new life.
humanity could not find it, that is, not every state, not every society
It means the seeker of wisdom. He is the One who seeks the knowledge of the truth.
It is necessary that Mecnun married Leyla and had children.
This is it if you want. Well, let me tell you a very interesting comment. Apostasy in Islam.
From that moment on, philosophy begins. Three people come together easily.
As they say, the lover of fleet is Sofia, the lover of wisdom is the muhibb.
This is the claim to possess the truth
They met and brought the madman to Leyla because she was crazy.
You're killing it, it's not him, I know it, kill him

Of course, they brought the same girl, Leyla, hundreds of them.
Everyone but we know that most of what they tell is not a fairy tale.
That's why he says he bent the thing, he says two things also say this to belief
academia is full of slaves of dogma, so much so that it knows which surahs
They feel like they don't have any thongs so
If the need for freedom increases, this will emerge, not an individual decision. Oh, come on.
You're joining me, take Leyla
Which, as the ancients put it, is spiritual power.
You write, there are systematic philosophers as much as Kant is
He rose and so on, that's what they tell the people, this is what the love of truth is like.
We have dogmas, come on, come here, let's serve you from here, etc.
After writing Roads are opening e where is philosophy
you got it
Therefore, to seek wisdom is to seek the knowledge of the truth. And this will last until our last breath.
I don't mean this in a malicious way. This is normal. That's why we ask
Salaries are good
To make room, Kant says, or nothing
There are different comments. So a lot of quality comments.
Truth Or rather, it is the seeker of Wisdom. What is Wisdom? Aristotle in metaphysics
Do you not believe in any truth? They feel so free.
They can't produce, they don't fight anything because they don't have any trauma.
Let me deal with philosophy. This is not my individual decision, the social process makes it possible for me.
Negation remains, it turns out to be everything, D is a lie, that is a lie, that is a lie, etc. You
We brought it, he said, that's not what I meant
So symbolic
It doesn't work, Rahim says that he loved his mother very much, Kant says that he is against morality.
The quest itself is blessed
to be Hegel
No, why doesn't philosophy exist in Turkey? The academy is full of them.
Where is the search for truth in society?
He said, that wasn't me, that's what they say, there and there, for God's sake.
It takes as long as it takes, what we found, what Elik, what happened in the meantime, his story.
established
They buy things, that's all, the whole ordeal is until the doctorate, and then that's it.
It seems that Leyla misunderstood me when they brought her to her.
Well, their situation is good if they don't disturb the government or anything.
No one can leap beyond their own historicality.
describes knowledge of truth episteme Alya's knowledge
Everyone is thrown somewhere, at certain stages, some of these things are just a waste of time.
What are you saying? I don't say anything. From now on, Enjoy a little something in the hammock.
Hence the word philosopher itself

There is a breakdown, it is inevitable. This is not normal.
The shackles on your feet are getting bigger, so get tighter
Slowly, he loosens your chains, that is, 10 meters long.
For the Marxist, Marxism gives meaning to the world. That's why he can't abandon it.
They call it marxism, but they are religious. That is the religious consciousness in my mind.
Well, mother, father, children, siblings, friends, lovers
I will go to bed
It's definitely a place I want to go
in
Remembering is something I've always been looking for. To reach the top that I've always wanted
to reach.
Don't worry about what's going on in life
Sir, I forgot something. Well done to all of you.
Losing my desire and enthusiasm to search for something
In your hand, are you a priest, are you from the community, are you from the imam, are you from the muezzin,
are you a teacher?
The one on the left will remain. If you untie the one on the left, the handcuffs will remain. I don't know, but
this is a
Yes, we have extended a lot of time today for all of you.
It is a chain, if it is opened a little, it can be 20 meters, 30 meters etc.
It didn't reach any conclusion. So, in my opinion, the biggest punishment is that. What if they asked me?
system, a system of values that I cannot give up, a package of truth
I understand that he glorifies him, I am religious children
It doesn't matter whether he is a Muslim or a Marxist, he says he is a liberal, he says he is a Kemalist, etc. I
look at him.
You don't have to say "Happy holidays to you and your loved ones"
holiday
be careful, it is a very serious thing for those who break up with certain things.
It's happened, it's very tiring, you've had your share of life
It may even tear off your foot, it may make you unable to walk, or it may slow you down.
The hills I wanted became the mountains, the seas became the rivers I wanted to cross
There are things that cannot be criticized and that you cannot give up, this is an advantage.
Rather than giving meaning to life, because there is meaning, ideologies give meaning.
holidays  to your loved ones
I'm afraid I've never been bored in my life.
Anyway, your place doesn't matter, but is there a dogma you stand on?
lifelong struggle and I think this is the Soylu side
I wish you a good night, see you
Well, I don't want it to end like that, that's what I'm most afraid of.
I swear, he is more religious than me. I mean, he is too much to be like that.
So maybe you can manage to untie that chain on your right foot.
is there
every day for people like us
If you have subtraction, do you have the truth or not? A system of values that you rely on?
